Hawaii, session 2026, SB649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 261, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§261-     Aircraft; fireworks; articles pyrotechnic; inspection.  (a)  The department shall inspect all personal aircraft entering the State and landing at any airport owned or controlled by the department for the purpose of preventing the unauthorized transportation of fireworks and articles pyrotechnic into the State. (b) The department shall coordinate with an appropriate law enforcement agency or county fire department to dispose of prohibited fireworks and articles pyrotechnic pursuant to section 132D-26. (c) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this section." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________